Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska89-1,104
Grain moisture measuring devices; inspections; fee.

The Public Service Commission, grain warehouse department, shall enforce the provisions of sections 89-1,104 to 89-1,108. It shall make or cause to be made all inspections and may establish tolerances and specifications for grain moisture measuring devices similar to the tolerances and specifications recommended or used by the grain branch of the United States Department of Agriculture, which shall have for their object the establishment of more accurate grain moisture measuring in the State of Nebraska. The Public Service Commission may charge a fee to cover the cost of inspecting grain moisture measuring devices.

Laws 1978, LB 636, § 1.